Illinois, session 104th, SB1511.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much of that sum as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the Education 6Assistance Fund to the Illinois Student Assistance Commission 7for grants to eligible nurse educators to use for payment of 8their educational loans pursuant to Public Act 94-1020. 9    Section 10. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much of that sum 10as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 11Fund to the Board of Higher Education for nurse educator 12fellowships to supplement nurse faculty salaries. 13    Section 15. The sum of $1,500,000, or so much of that sum 14as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 15Fund to the Board of Higher Education for competitive grants 16for nursing schools to increase the number of graduating 17nurses. 18    Section 20. The sum of $6,000,000, or so much of that sum 19as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Nursing 20Dedicated and Professional Fund to the Illinois Student 21Assistance Commission for expenses related to the Nursing   SB1511- 2 -LRB104 06396 LNS 16432 b1Education Scholarship Law. 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 32025.